District of Columbia statutes.
42-1904.18

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or any paragraph, section, sentence, clause, phrase or word or the application thereof, in any circumstances is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this chapter, and of the application of any such provision, paragraph, section, sentence, clause, phrase or word in any circumstances shall not be affected thereby and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are declared severable.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title IV, § 418, 23 DCR 9532b

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1878.
1973 Ed., § 5-1278.